Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2468
Bonds; negotiable; sale.

(1) Except as the issuing agency's board may otherwise provide, any bond and any interest coupons thereto attached shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of article 8, Uniform Commercial Code.

(2) The bonds may be sold at public or private sale as the issuing agency's board may provide and at such price or prices as such board shall determine.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 68.